Utah statutes.
75-1-304.   Practice in court.

Unless specifically provided to the contrary in this code or unless inconsistent with its provisions, the rules of civil procedure, including the rules concerning vacation of orders and appellate review, govern formal proceedings under this code.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

